Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 1
SHORT TITLE AND POLICY

11-101-101. Short title.

Articles 101 to 109 and article 10.5 of this title shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Banking Code". A reference to the code means the Colorado Banking Code as amended from time to time.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1051, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-1-101 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-101-102. Declaration of policy.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state of Colorado that, to protect the public interest, the business of all state banks be supervised and regulated in such manner as to:

Preserve and promote:

Sound and constructive competition among financial services institutions;

A dual federal and state banking system;

The security of deposits;

The safe and sound conduct of the business of state banks; and

A statewide safe and sound banking system;

Seek:

Regulatory coordination and cooperation; and

Regulatory parity among financial services institutions; and

Encourage diversity in financial products and services.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1051, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-1-101.5 as it existed prior to 2003.